Wisconsin, session 2025, AB142.
do enact as follows:AB142,11Section 1. 704.44 (11) of the statutes is created to read:AB142,2,42704.44 (11) Waives the landlord’s obligation to comply with s. 704.60 (2) or 3discourages or impedes a tenant from filing an action or seeking injunctive relief or 4damages under s. 704.60 (3).AB142,25Section 2. 704.60 of the statutes is created to read:AB142,2,66704.60 Use of algorithmic software. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB142,2,147(a) “Algorithmic software” means software, including revenue management 8software, that uses an algorithm to perform calculations on nonpublic competitor 9data regarding rent or occupancy levels in this state for the purpose of informing a 10landlord’s decision regarding residential housing occupancy rates, whether to leave 11a residential unit vacant, or the amount of rent that a landlord may obtain for a 12residential unit. “Algorithmic software” includes a product or device that 13incorporates algorithmic software. “Algorithmic software” does not include any of 14the following:AB142,2,16151. A publication of existing aggregated rental data if the publication does not 16recommend rental rates or occupancy levels for future leases.AB142,2,19172. A product used for the purpose of establishing rent or income limits in 18accordance with affordable housing guidelines or requirements of a local, state, or 19federal program.AB142,3,420(b) “Nonpublic competitor data” means housing-related information that is not 1available to the general public regarding actual amounts charged for rent, 2occupancy rates, lease start and end dates, or similar data, regardless of whether 3the information is attributable to, derived from, or otherwise provided by a person 4that competes in the same or related market.AB142,3,65(2) Algorithmic software. (a) No person shall sell, license, or provide to a 6residential landlord algorithmic software.AB142,3,87(b) No person may use algorithmic software to set rental rates or occupancy 8levels for residential dwelling units.AB142,3,119(3) Enforcement and penalty. (a) The department of agriculture, trade 10and consumer protection, the attorney general, or a district attorney may 11investigate an alleged violation of sub. (2).AB142,3,1912(b) The attorney general or a district attorney may commence an action in the 13name of the state to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction a violation of 14sub. (2) or to recover a civil forfeiture of up to $1,000 per violation. The court shall 15award the attorney general or district attorney court costs and, notwithstanding s. 16814.04 (1), reasonable attorney fees, if the attorney general or district attorney is 17the prevailing party in the action. Each month in which a violation exists or 18continues constitutes a separate offense. Each dwelling unit for which a person has 19used algorithmic software in violation of sub. (2) (b) constitutes a separate offense.AB142,4,420(c) A tenant may file a civil action for a violation of sub. (2) on behalf of himself 21or herself, or on behalf of himself or herself and all persons similarly situated, for 22actual damages incurred as a result of a violation of sub. (2), or damages of $1,000 23per violation, whichever is greater, or for injunctive relief, or for a combination of 24damages and injunctive relief. The court shall award the tenant court costs and, 1notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), reasonable attorney fees if the tenant is the 2prevailing party in the action. The court may also award any equitable relief to a 3prevailing party as may be determined by the court if the tenant, or the tenant and 4all persons similarly situated, is the prevailing party in the action.AB142,4,55